Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.090

Interference by force or violence—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, singly or in concert with others, to interfere by force or violence with any administrator, teacher, classified employee, person under contract with the school or school district, or student of any common school who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies. Any such interference by force or violence committed by a student shall be grounds for immediate suspension or expulsion of the student.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2003 c 53 s 169; 1996 c 321 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 540; 1988 c 2 s 1; 1971 c 45 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.87.230.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.